Maryland, session 2026, HB0260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0260*

HOUSE BILL 260
15–102.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Fund” means the Fair Campaign Financing Fund.
15–107.
(a) (1) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section and regulations
adopted by the State Board, the State Board shall authorize distribution of money in the
Fund on a continuing basis on certification that the qualifications under § 15–104 of this
title have been met.
(2) Distributions shall begin not earlier than [January] JULY 1 of the year
[of] BEFORE the election.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.